Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-116
Department of Health and Human Services; actions at law.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the power to bring all suits necessary to protect the interests of the state. Such proceedings shall be instituted in the name of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 26, p. 546;

R.S.1913, § 7204;

C.S.1922, § 6855;

C.S.1929, § 83-126;

R.S.1943, § 83-116;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 905.

Service of summons in actions against state, see section 25-21,203.